Hawaii statutes.
§206E-20 Court proceedings; preferences;
venue. (a) Any action or proceeding to which the authority, the State, or
the county may be a party, in which any question arises as to the validity of
this chapter, shall be brought in the circuit court of the circuit where the
case or controversy arises, and shall be heard and determined in preference to
all other civil cases pending therein except election cases, irrespective of
position on the calendar.

(b) Upon application of counsel to the
authority, the same preference shall be granted in any action or proceeding
questioning the validity of this chapter in which the authority may be allowed
to intervene.

(c) Any action or proceeding to which the
authority, the State, or the county may be a party, in which any question
arises as to the validity of this chapter or any portion of this chapter, may
be filed in the circuit court of the circuit where the case or controversy
arises, which court is hereby vested with original jurisdiction over the
action.

(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, declaratory relief may be obtained for the action.

(e) Any party aggrieved by the decision of the
circuit court may appeal in accordance with part I of chapter 641 and the
appeal shall be given priority. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1; am L 1985, c 37, §1;
am L 2001, c 251, §6]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next